Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-237
Construction of policies. Every insurance contract shall be construed
according to the entirety of its terms and conditions as set forth in the
policy, and as amplified, extended, restricted, or modified by any rider,
endorsement or application attached to and made a part of the policy. [L 1987,
c 347, pt of §2]

Cross References

Insurance policies issued to construction professionals, see
§431:1-217.

Case Notes

Waiting period exclusion in insurance policy requiring
completion of three months of continuous active service for employee to be
eligible for benefits was clear and unambiguous since term "employee"
must be read and construed according to its meaning as defined in the policy as
one employed on a regular full-time permanent basis. 72 H. 531, 827 P.2d 635.

Because Hawaii law requires every insurance policy to be
subject to the general rules of contract construction, and an assignment by
operation of law is merely an extension of the common law tort rule of
successor liability, trial court erred in concluding that an assignment by
operation of law was consistent with Hawaii's rules governing construction of
insurance policies. 117 H. 357, 183 P.3d 734 (2007).

Cited: 451 F. Supp. 2d 1147 (2006); 725 F. Supp. 2d 1219
(2010); 877 F. Supp. 2d 993 (2012).

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next